Rhode Island statutes. Title 11 Criminal Offenses
Chapter 55 Paramilitary Training

11-55-1.
Definitions.

For the purposes of this chapter:

“Civil disorder” means any public disturbance involving acts of violence by assemblages of three (3) or more persons, which causes an immediate danger of, or results in, damage or injury to the property or person of any other individual.

“Explosive or incendiary device” means:

Dynamite and all other forms of high explosives;

Any explosive bomb, grenade, missile, or similar device; and

Any incendiary bomb or grenade, fire bomb, or similar device, including any device which:

Consists of or includes a breakable container including a flammable liquid or compound, and a wick composed of any material which, when ignited, is capable of igniting the flammable liquid or compound; and

Can be carried or thrown by one individual acting alone.

“Firearm” means any weapon which is designed to, or may readily be converted to, expel any projectile by the action of an explosive; or the frame or receiver of any weapon of that type.

“Law enforcement officer” means any officer or employee of the United States, any state, or any political subdivision of a state acting in his or her official capacity; the term shall specifically include, but shall not be limited to, members of the National Guard, as defined in 10 U.S.C. § 101(9), the naval militia, the independent chartered military organizations set forth in §

30-1-4

and the department of environmental management in the operation of a firearm training course under its auspices.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 391, § 1.

11-55-2.
Paramilitary training prohibited.

Any person who teaches or demonstrates to any other person the use, application, or making of any firearm, explosive or incendiary device, or technique capable of causing injury or death to persons, knowing or having reason to know or intending that it will be unlawfully employed for use in, or in furtherance of, a civil disorder; or any person who assembles with one or more persons for the purpose of training with, practicing with, or being instructed in the use of any firearm, explosive, or incendiary device, or technique capable of causing injury or death to persons, intending to employ it unlawfully for use in, or in furtherance of, a civil disorder shall be guilty of a felony.

Nothing contained in this section shall make unlawful any act of any law enforcement officer which is performed in the lawful performance of his or her official duties.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 391, § 1.

11-55-3.
Penalty for violation.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this chapter shall, upon conviction, be imprisoned for not more than five (5) years, or be fined not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000), or both.

History of Section.

P.L. 1982, ch. 187, § 1; P.L. 1982, ch. 391, § 1.